North Dakota, session 69, HB1418.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 29-06-15 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
29-06-15. Arrest without warrant - Peace officer - Federal agent.
1. A law enforcement officer, without a warrant, may arrest a person:
a. For a public offense, committed or attempted in the officer's presence and for the
purpose of this subdivision, a crime must be deemed committed or attempted in the
officer's presence when what the officer observes through the officer's senses reasonably
indicates to the officer that a crime was in fact committed or attempted in the officer's
presence by the person arrested.
b. When the person arrested has committed a felony, although not in the officer's presence.
c. When a felony in fact has been committed, and the officer has reasonable cause to
believe the person arrested to have committed it.
d. On a charge, made upon reasonable cause, of the commission of a felony by the party
arrested.
e. For the public offenses, not classified as felonies and not committed in the officer's
presence as provided for under section 29-06-15.1.
f. On a charge, made upon reasonable cause, of driving or being in actual physical control
of a vehicle while under the influence of alcoholic beveragesin violation of section
39 - 08 - 01 .
g. For the offense of violating a protection order under section 14-07.1-06, an order
prohibiting contact under section 12.1-31.2-02, or for an assault involving domestic
violence under section 14-07.1-11.
h. On a charge, made upon reasonable cause, of being under the influence of volatile
chemical vapors in violation of section 19-03.1-22.1.
i. For the offense of harassing a public safety agency or making a false report to a public
safety agency under subsection 4 of section 12.1 - 17 - 07 .
2. A federal agent, without a warrant, may arrest a person if all of the following circumstances
exist:
a. The officer is on duty.
b. One or more of the following situations exist:

H. B. NO. 1418 - PAGE 2
(1) The person commits an assault or other crime, defined and punishable under
chapter 12.1-17, against the officer or against any other person in the presence of
the officer.
(2) The officer has reasonable cause to believe that a crime, as defined in paragraph 1,
has been committed and reasonable cause to believe that the person to be arrested
has committed it.
(3) The officer has reasonable cause to believe that a felony has been committed and
reasonable cause to believe that the person to be arrested has committed it.
(4) The officer has received positive information from an authoritative source that a
peace officer holds a warrant for the person's arrest.
3. If a law enforcement officer has reasonable cause to believe an individual has violated a lawful
order of a court of this state which requires the individual to participate in the twenty-four
seven sobriety program authorized in sections 54-12-27 through 54-12-31, the law
enforcement officer may immediately take the individual into custody without a warrant. An
individual taken into custody under this subsection may not be released on bail or on the
individual's personal recognizance unless the individual has made a personal appearance
before a magistrate.

H. B. NO. 1418 - PAGE 3
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1418.
House Vote: Yeas 83 Nays 7 Absent 4
Senate Vote: Yeas 44 Nays 1 Absent 2
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State